Massachusetts, session 194th, H2302.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 43D of the General Laws, as amended by section 176
of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by inserting before the definition of
“Governing body” the following definition:-
"Community development plan", a comprehensive, strategic plan for the future of a city
or town, which shall include, but not be limited to, a plan for: (i) new housing opportunities; (ii)
any new commercial or industrial economic development; (iii) existing infrastructure that needs
to serve new uses, including, but not limited to uses for water, transportation, housing or
electricity; (iv) transportation infrastructure; (v) climate change and resiliency; or (vi) open
space.
SECTION 2. Section 3 of said chapter 43D, as appearing in section 177 of said chapter
238, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof the following
subsection:-
of 3

(a) In order for a property to receive a designation as a priority development site, the site
or infrastructure need shall: (i) be approved by a town meeting in a town; (ii) be identified in a
local comprehensive master plan, housing needs assessment, economic development plan,
district or corridor plan or community development plan; (iii) be identified in a local capital
improvement plan or a plan developed by a regional planning agency; or (iv) be part of a project
approved by the planning board or special permit granting authority. The governing body shall
file a formal proposal with the interagency permitting board. The proposal shall include: (A) a
detailed description of the property; (B) attestation of the governing body’s good faith
commitment to comply with this chapter; (C) written authorization of the property or utility
owner as applicable; and (D) at the discretion of the governing body, a request for a technical
assistance grant.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 43D is hereby further amended by inserting after section 13
the following section:-
Section 13A. (a) Technical assistance funding is intended to be a one-time grant to
municipality, if the municipality has adopted expedited permitting as provided in sections 3 to
11, inclusive.
(b) A municipality shall be eligible for technical assistance funding, which may be less
than the previous amounts awarded, for a second time if it has identified and successfully
permitted 1 priority development site.
(c) The secretaries of the executive office of housing and livable communities, the
executive office of economic development and the executive office of energy and environmental
affairs, collectively, shall develop and implement a 2-year program to provide technical
of 3

assistance and resources to cities and towns for the purpose of creating community development
plans. Such assistance may include the provision of in-kind services or discretionary funds where
appropriate.
of 3